Washington statutes.
RCW 43.30.235

Records—Rules.

(1) The board shall keep its records in the office of the commissioner, and shall keep a full and complete record of its proceedings relating to the appraisal of lands granted for educational purposes.

(2) Records for all forestlands acquired by the state and any lands owned by the state and designated as such by the department must be maintained by the department as provided in RCW 79.22.030.

(3) The board shall have the power, from time to time, to make and enforce rules for carrying out the provisions of this title relating to its duties not inconsistent with law.

[ 2003 c 334 s 304; 1988 c 128 s 51; 1982 1st ex.s. c 21 s 149; 1927 c 255 s 13; RRS s 7797-13. Formerly RCW 79.01.052, 43.65.020.]

NOTES:

Intent—2003 c 334: See note following RCW 79.02.010.

Savings—Captions—Severability—Effective dates—1982 1st ex.s. c 21: See RCW 79.135.900 through 79.135.904.